Utah statutes.
73-18-8.   Safety equipment required to be on board vessels.
(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (1)(c), each vessel shall have, for
each person on board, one personal flotation device which is approved for the
type of use by the commandant of the United States Coast Guard.
(b)  Each personal flotation device shall be:
(i)  in serviceable condition;
(ii)  legally marked with the United States Coast Guard approval number; and
(iii)  of an appropriate size for the person for whom it is intended.
(c) (i)  Sailboards are exempt from the provisions of Subsection (1)(a).
(ii)  The board may exempt certain types of vessels from the provisions of
Subsection (1)(a) under certain conditions or upon certain waters.
(d)  The board may require by rule for personal flotation devices to be worn:
(i)  while a person is on board a certain type of vessel;
(ii)  by a person under a certain age; or
(iii)  on certain waters of the state.
(e)  For vessels 16 feet or more in length, there shall also be on board, one
Type IV throwable personal flotation device which is approved for this use by
the commandant of the United States Coast Guard.
(2)  Each vessel shall display navigation lights when the vessel is on the
waters of this state between sunset and sunrise.
(3)  If a vessel is not entirely open and it carries or uses any flammable or
toxic fluid in any enclosure for any purpose, the vessel must be equipped with
an efficient natural or mechanical ventilation system which is capable of
removing resulting gases prior to and during the time the vessel is occupied
by any person.
(4)  Each vessel shall have fire extinguishing equipment on board.
(5)  Any inboard gasoline engine shall be equipped with a carburetor backfire
flame control device.
(6)  The board may:
(a)  require additional safety equipment by rule; and
(b)  adopt rules conforming with the requirements of this section which govern
specifications for and the use of safety equipment.
(7)  A person may not operate or give permission for the operation of a vessel
which is not equipped as required by this section or rules promulgated under
this section.
